Massachusetts, session 194th, H2811.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 29 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following
section:-
Section 72. (a) As used in this section the following words shall, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:-
“Biofuel”, any fuel made from biomass.
“Board”, the pension reserves investment management board established pursuant to
section 23 of chapter 32.
“Climate risk investments,” any fossil fuel investments or investment in other industries,
including, but not limited to biofuel, that may have a negative impact on the global climate, that
scientific evidence has established as contributing to climate change, that conflict with or
of 10

undermine the commonwealth’s climate goals, and that pose a risk to the portfolio performance
for beneficiaries of the public fund.
“Committee”, the climate risk investment review committee established pursuant to
subsection (c).
“Direct holdings”, all securities of a company held directly by the public fund or in an
account or fund in which the public fund owns all shares or interests.
“Fossil fuel investments”, any stocks or other securities of a corporation or company
within the fossil fuel industry or any subsidiary, affiliate or parent of any corporation or company
among the 200 largest publicly traded fossil fuel companies, as established by carbon in the
companies’ proven oil, gas and coal reserves.
“Indirect holdings”, all securities of a company held in an account or fund, such as a
mutual fund, managed by 1 or more persons not employed by the public fund, in which the
public fund owns shares or interests together with other investors not subject to this section or
section 23C of chapter 32.
“Public fund”, the Pension Reserves Investment Trust or the pension reserves investment
management board in charge of managing the pooled investment fund consisting of the assets of
the state employees’ and teachers’ retirement systems as well as the assets of local retirement
systems under the control of the board.
(b) This section applies only to direct and indirect holdings by the public fund.
(c) There shall be within the office of the treasurer, but not subject to its supervision or
control, a Climate Risk Investment Review Committee consisting of the following 12 voting
of 10

members: the state treasurer or a designee, who shall serve as chair; the secretary of
administration and finance or a designee; the comptroller or a designee; the executive director of
the public employee retirement administration commission; a member of the pension reserves
investment management stewardship and sustainability committee; 1 member of the
Massachusetts state retirement board; 1 individual appointed by the governor, who shall be in a
position to oversee implementation of chapter 8 of the acts of 2021; 2 individuals appointed by
the treasurer, 1 of whom shall be an expert in state public finance and 1 of whom shall be an
expert in divestment planning; 1 individual with climate finance experience; 1 individual
appointed by the secretary of energy and environmental affairs who shall be a climate scientist;
and the climate chief or a designee. The house and senate chairs and the ranking minority
members of the joint committee on financial services and the house and senate chairs and the
ranking minority members of the joint committee on telecommunications, utilities, and energy
shall be nonvoting members of the committee. Each individual appointed by the governor,
treasurer and secretary of energy and environmental affairs shall serve terms established by the
appointing authority, but not longer than 4 years. Each appointed individual may serve a second
or subsequent term, and each appointed individual may continue to serve after the individual’s
term expires if desired by the appointing authority. The state treasurer shall determine the
necessity of and calculate the amount of funds needed to compensate members for their
participation. Funding shall be included in the state treasurer’s request for funding as part of its
budget process.
(d) The chair shall call meetings of the committee every 8 weeks; provided, however, that
the chair may call meetings of the committee more frequently if the chair determines that more
of 10

frequent meetings of the committee are necessary to perform its duties. The chair shall call the
first meeting of the committee within 4 weeks following the effective date of this section.
(e) (1) The committee shall: (i) study and review on a continuing basis the risk associated
with all investments made by the board in any climate risk investments; and (ii) assess the
readiness of the public fund for the purposes of implementing the sale, redemption, divestment or
withdrawal of climate investments. The committee shall, in accordance with sound investment
criteria and consistent with the committee's fiduciary obligations, take into account that climate
risk investments have financial risks to pension beneficiaries and the commonwealth’s taxpayers.
The committee shall provide recommendations and a series of decisions to mitigate those risks
through an active decarbonization of the pension portfolio. The committee shall report on efforts
to conduct Climate Transition Planning or efforts to encourage climate aware strategic plans and
business models.
(2) The committee shall, on or before 180 days after the effective date of this section,
develop a plan to sell, redeem, divest or withdraw from climate risk investments, or any other
investment as determined by the committee, that are not aligned with the commonwealth’s
climate goals and stewardship priorities. The plan shall detail how to expeditiously sell, redeem,
divest or withdraw from climate risk investments that contribute toward greenhouse gas
emissions, and from 100 per cent of these investments not later than January 1, 2026 pursuant to
clause (2) of subsection (c) of section 23C of chapter 32.
(f) Annually, not later than December 15, the committee shall file a report with the board,
the governor and the clerks of the house of representative and the senate detailing the
committee’s recommendations as to divestment from climate risk investments and any plan to
of 10

limit negative economic impacts or divest from carbon producing industries. The committee’s
report shall direct the board’s actions.
(g) The committee shall be subject to sections 18 to 25, inclusive, of chapter 30A and
chapter 66. The committee shall maintain a website and shall make available all meeting
materials not later than 7 days after a meeting of the committee.
SECTION 2. Section 23 of chapter 32 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting after subdivision 8, inserted by section 14 of chapter 358 of the acts of 2020, the
following subdivision:-
(9) The PRIM Board shall not approve or ratify any fossil fuel investments as defined in
section 23C. The PRIM Board shall not approve or ratify any climate risk investments as defined
in section 23C.
SECTION 3. Said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting after
section 23B the following section:-
Section 23C. (a) As used in this section the following words shall, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:-
“Actively managed investment funds”, any investment fund that is managed by a single
manager or a management team who makes decisions regarding how to invest money held in the
fund.
“Biofuel”, any fuel made from biomass.
“Board”, the pension reserves investment management board established pursuant to
section 23 of chapter 32.
of 10

“Climate risk investments,” as defined in section 72 of chapter 29.
“Committee”, the climate risk investment review committee established pursuant to
section 72 of chapter 29.
100 “Direct holdings”, all securities of a company held directly by the public fund or in an
101 account or fund in which the public fund owns all shares or interests.
102 “Fossil fuel investments”, any stocks or other securities of a corporation or company
103 within the fossil fuel industry or any subsidiary, affiliate or parent of any corporation or company
104 among the 200 largest publicly traded fossil fuel companies, as established by carbon in the
105 companies’ proven oil, gas and coal reserves.
106 “Indirect holdings”, all securities of a company held in an account or fund, such as a
107 mutual fund, managed by 1 or more persons not employed by the public fund, in which the
108 public fund owns shares or interests together with other investors not subject to this section.
109 “Public fund”, the Pension Reserves Investment Trust or the pension reserves investment
110 management board in charge of managing the pooled investment fund consisting of the assets of
111 the state employees’ and teachers’ retirement systems as well as the assets of local retirement
112 systems under the control of the board.
113 (b) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, within 90 days of the
114 effective date of this section, the public fund, in consultation with the committee, shall identify
115 all climate risk investments in which the public fund has direct or indirect holdings. By the first
116 meeting of the public fund following the 90-day period, the public fund shall assemble all
117 climate risk investments in which it has direct or indirect holdings into a climate risk investments
of 10

118 list. The public fund shall update the climate risk investments list on a quarterly basis based on
119 evolving information gathered by the public fund and the committee.
120 (c) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the public fund shall:
121 (1) determine the companies on the climate risk investments list, created pursuant to
122 subsection (b), in which the public fund owns direct or indirect holdings;
123 (2) not later than January 1, 2026, in accordance with sound investment criteria and
124 consistent with the public fund’s fiduciary obligations, sell, redeem, divest or withdraw all
125 publicly-traded securities of each company identified in clause (1); and
126 (3) in the time period before the sale, redemption, divestment or withdrawal pursuant to
127 clause (2), the public fund may sign onto engagement letters or participate in shareholder
128 resolutions regarding the scrutinized business operations of companies identified in clause (1) in
129 which the public fund still owns direct or indirect holdings.
130 (d) The public fund shall not acquire securities of companies on the climate risk
131 investment list created pursuant to clause (1) of subsection (c), except as provided for in
132 subsection (e).
133 (e) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, subsections (c) and (d) shall
134 not apply to indirect holdings in actively managed investment funds; provided, however, that the
135 public fund shall submit letters to the managers of such investment funds containing climate risk
136 investments requesting that the managers consider removing such climate risk investments from
137 the investment fund or create a similarly actively managed fund with indirect holdings devoid of
138 such investments. If the manager creates a similar fund devoid of climate risk investments, the
of 10

139 public fund shall replace all applicable investments with investments in the similar fund in an
140 expedited timeframe consistent with prudent investing standards. If the manager refuses to create
141 a similar fund devoid of climate risk investments, the public fund shall, in consultation with the
142 committee, develop an alternative plan to decarbonize such investment funds within 30 days of
143 receiving notice from the manager. For the purposes of this section, private equity funds shall be
144 deemed to be actively managed investment funds.
145 (f) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, with respect to actions
146 taken in compliance with this section, the public fund shall be exempt from any conflicting
147 statutory or common law obligations, including any such obligations with respect to choice of
148 asset managers, investment funds or investments for the public fund’s securities portfolios and
149 all good faith determinations regarding companies as required by this section.
150 (g) The public fund shall file a copy of the climate risk investment list with the clerks of
151 the house of representatives and the senate within 30 days after the list is created. Annually
152 thereafter, not later than February 1, the public fund shall file a report with the clerks of the
153 house of representatives and the senate that includes: (1) the most recent scrutinized companies
154 list; (2) all climate risk investments sold, redeemed, divested or withdrawn in compliance with
155 this section; (3) all prohibited climate risk investments from which the public fund has not yet
156 divested pursuant to this section; (4) any progress made pursuant to subsection (e); and (5)
157 documentation that the public fund has complied with subsection (e), including, but not limited
158 to, copies of letters requesting the removal of climate risk investments from actively managed
159 investment funds and documentation as to what actions were taken by the manager of such fund
160 and the public fund subsequent to such requests.
of 10

161 SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the pension
162 fund of any state agency or state authority, as defined in section 1 of chapter 29 of the General
163 Laws, not subject to chapter 32 of the General Laws shall annually review, in consultation with
164 the climate risk investment review committee established pursuant to section 72 of said chapter
165 29, all climate risk investments, as defined in section 23C of chapter 32 of the General Laws, and
166 investments in other industries that may have a negative impact on the global climate or conflict
167 or undermine the commonwealth’s climate goals; provided, that when the climate risk
168 investment review committee assesses that certain investments have a negative impact on the
169 global climate or conflict with the commonwealth’s climate goals, the pension fund of the state
170 agency or state authority shall divest from those investments. The pension fund of the state
171 agency or state authority shall consider the economic impact of investments in industries that
172 may have a negative impact on the global climate and determine whether it is prudent, in
173 accordance with chapter 203C, to continue investment on behalf of the beneficiaries of
174 retirement systems named in this section.
175 The pension fund of the state agency or state authority shall, in accordance with sound
176 investment criteria and consistent with the fund's fiduciary obligations, take into account that
177 carbon investments have financial risks to pension beneficiaries and take appropriate action
178 pursuant to this section.
179 SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the pension
180 fund of the city, town, district or county that is not subject to chapter 32 of the General Laws nor
181 under the control of the pension reserves investment management board may request and access
182 information and reports relevant to the decision to divest from climate risk investments, as
183 defined in section 23C of said chapter 32, from the climate risk investment review committee.
of 10

184 The information and reports may include, but shall not be limited to, annual reports prepared by
185 the climate risk investment review committee pursuant to subsection (f) of section 72 of chapter
186 29 and the climate risk investment list prepared pursuant to subsection (b) of said section 23C.
of 10